Utah statutes.
10-8-6.   Borrowing power -- Warrants and bonds.
They may borrow money on the credit of the corporation for corporate purposes
in the manner and to the extent allowed by the Constitution and the laws, and
issue warrants and bonds therefor in such amounts and forms and on such
conditions as they shall determine.
